Florida, session 2026, HB323.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 316.1971, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
316.1971 Parking on public property.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb323-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 323 2026
(a) "Public property" means any publicly owned way or
place used by vehicles, including, but not limited to, streets,
roadways, highways, parking garages, and metered or timed
parking spaces or parking lots.
(b) "Publicly owned buildings or facilities" means a
building or facility owned by a state or local governmental
entity or agency. The term includes any building or facility
owned by a state universities or Florida College System
institution.
(2) A local government shall refund an owner of a vehicle
who pays a fee to park on public property, including public
property associated with publicly owned buildings or facilities,
any portion of such fee if the owner does not use the allotted
time. In the event a refund is not possible, the local
government shall carry over any unused portion of time for the
benefit of the next vehicle owner who pays a fee to park on the
same public property.
(3) If a vehicle is parked on public property, including
public property associated with publicly owned buildings or
facilities, in violation of a county or municipal law or
ordinance governing parking:
(a) The vehicle may not be towed until at least 12 hours
have elapsed from the time the vehicle was parked, if parked on
a street, roadway, or highway; or
(b) The vehicle owner may not be issued a traffic citation
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb323-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 323 2026
until at least 2 hours have elapsed from the time the meter or
allotted time expired, if parked in a metered or timed public
parking space, public parking lot, or public parking garage.
(4) A local government may not allow a private business
entity or enterprise to use public property for private parking
purposes for a fee.
(5) This section does not prohibit the governing body of a
county or municipality, with respect to public property under
its jurisdiction, from regulating the parking of vehicles for
any purpose.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb323-00